en: First Aid Kits
xx: First Aid Kits
cs: Příruční lékárničky
da: Førstehjælpssæt
de: Erste-Hilfe-Koffer
es: Botiquín de primeros auxilios
fr: Trousses de premiers secours
it: Kit di primo soccorso
ja: 救急セット
nl: EHBO-dozen
no: Førstehjelpsett
pl: Zestawy pierwszej pomocy
pt: Kits de primeiros socorros
ru: Наборы для оказания первой помощи
sv: Förstahjälpenutrustning
tr: İlk Yardım Setleri

en: Hot & Cold Therapies
xx: Hot & Cold Therapies
cs: Studené a teplé obklady
da: Varme og kolde terapier
de: Warm & Kalt Therapie
es: Terapias de frío y calor
fr: Thermothérapies et cryothérapies
it: Terapie freddo e caldo
ja: 温熱・冷却療法
nl: Warme en koude therapieën
no: Varme- og kuldebehandlinger
pl: Leczenie ciepłem i zimnem
pt: Tratamentos a frio e a quente
ru: Лечение теплом и холодом
sv: Värmande och kylande produkter
tr: Sıcak ve Soğuk Terapiler

en: Heat Rubs
xx: Heat Rubs
cs: Hřejivé gely a masti
da: Varmecremer
de: Wärmecremes
es: Pomadas rubefacientes
fr: Baumes chauffants
it: Creme antinfiammatorie
ja: 温感外用薬
nl: Warmtezalven
no: Varmekremer
pl: Maści rozgrzewające
pt: Alívio contra dores musculares\, linimentos
ru: Разогревающие мази
sv: Värmesalvor
tr: Isıtıcı Kremler

en: Heating Pads
xx: Heating Pads
cs: Vyhřívané podložky
da: Varmepuder
de: Wärmflaschen & Heizkissen
es: Bolsas de calor
fr: Coussins chauffants
it: Cuscini per impacco caldo
ja: 温熱パッド
nl: Warmtepads
no: Varmeputer
pl: Podkładki rozgrzewające
pt: Almofadas de aquecimento
ru: Греющие подкладки
sv: Värmedynor
tr: Isıtma Yastıkları

en: Ice Packs
xx: Ice Packs
cs: Chladicí sáčky
da: Ispakker
de: Eisanwendungen
es: Bolsas de frío
fr: Poches de glace
it: Borse del ghiaccio
ja: 氷嚢
nl: IJskompressen
no: Ispakker
pl: Worki z lodem
pt: Sacos de gelo
ru: Охлаждающие подкладки
sv: Ispaket
tr: Buz Torbaları

en: Medical Tape & Bandages
xx: Medical Tape & Bandages
cs: Obinadla a pásky
da: Medicinsk tape og bandager
de: Medizinisches Klebeband & Verbandsmaterial
es: Esparadrapos y vendas
fr: Bandes et pansements
it: Bendaggi e nastri
ja: 包帯・医療用テープ
nl: Pleisters en verband
no: Medisinsk teip og bandasjer
pl: Środki opatrunkowe i bandaże
pt: Bandagens e fitas
ru: Бинты\, лейкопластыри и медицинские ленты
sv: Medicinsk tejp och bandage
tr: Tıbbi Bant ve Bandajlar

en: Adhesive bandages, plasters, band-aids, bandaids, elastoplast
da: Plastre
sv: Plåster

en: Adhesive bandages for kids, kids plasters
da: Børneplastre
sv: Barnplåster

en: PE adhesive bandages, PE plasters
de: PE-Pflastern
fi: PE-laastari
fr: Pansement en PE
nb: PE-plaster
nl: PE-pleister
pl: Plaster na folii PE
sv: Plåster av polyeten

en: Fitness & Nutrition
xx: Fitness & Nutrition
cs: Fitness a výživa
da: Fitness og ernæring
de: Fitness & Ernährung
es: Nutrición y actividad física
fr: Fitness et nutrition
it: Fitness e alimentazione
ja: ダイエット・サプリメント
nl: Fitness en voeding
no: Helse og ernæring
pl: Zdrowy tryb życia i dieta
pt: Preparo físico e nutrição
ru: Фитнес и питание
sv: Fitness och näringslära
tr: Fitness ve Sporcu Besinleri

en: Fitness equipment
de: Fitnessgeräte
es: Equipos de fitness
fr: Équipements de fitness

en: Nutrition Bars
xx: Nutrition Bars
cs: Energetické tyčinky
da: Proteinbarer
de: Sportriegel
es: Barritas energéticas
fr: Barres nutritionnelles
it: Barrette nutrizionali
ja: 栄養補給バー
nl: Voedingsrepen
no: Energibarer
pl: Batony energetyczne
pt: Barras nutritivas
ru: Питательные батончики
sv: Näringskakor
tr: Sporcu Çikolataları

en: Nutrition Drinks & Shakes
xx: Nutrition Drinks & Shakes
cs: Nápoje nahrazující jídlo
da: Proteindrikke og -shakes
de: Mahlzeitenersatz-Getränke
es: Bebidas sustitutivas de comidas
fr: Substituts de repas et compléments alimentaires
it: Drink sostitutivi del pasto
ja: 栄養補助・ダイエット用飲料
nl: Vloeibare maaltijdvervangers
no: Næringsdrikker og shaker
pl: Odżywcze napoje i szejki
pt: Bebidas que substituem refeições
ru: Питательные напитки
sv: Näringsdrycker och näringsshakes
tr: Sporcu İçecek ve Sıvıları

en: Nutrition Gels & Chews
xx: Nutrition Gels & Chews
cs: Energetické gely a žvýkací bonbóny
da: Proteingel og -tyggegummi
de: Energie-Gel & -Nahrung
es: Geles y productos masticables nutritivos
fr: Gels et gommes énergétiques
it: Gel e caramelle gommose nutritive
ja: 栄養補給ゼリー・グミ
nl: Voedingsgels en voedingstabletten
no: Energigel og tyggeprodukter
pl: Gumy do żucia i żele energetyczne
pt: Géis e mastigáveis nutritivos
ru: Питательные гели и жвачки
sv: Näringsgeler och tuggummin
tr: Sporcu Jel ve Sakızları

en: Nutritional Food Purées
xx: Nutritional Food Purées
cs: Pyré (výživa)
da: Ernæringsrigtige puréer
de: Pürierte Lebensmittel
es: Purés de alimentos nutritivos
fr: Purées et compotes
it: Purè alimentari
ja: ピューレ状栄養食品
nl: Gepureerd voedsel
no: Næringsrike matpuréer
pl: Purée energetyczne
pt: Purês
ru: Питательные пюре
sv: Matpuréer
tr: Yiyecek Püreleri

en: Tube Feeding Supplements
xx: Tube Feeding Supplements
cs: Doplňky pro enterální výživu
da: Tilskud til sondemad
de: Flüssignahrung zur künstlichen Ernährung
es: Suplementos para alimentación por sonda gástrica
fr: Compléments alimentaires administrés par sonde
it: Supplementi per alimentazione con sondino
ja: 径管栄養食
nl: Supplementen voor sondevoeding
no: Kosttilskudd for sondemat
pl: Suplementy do karmienia przez sondę
pt: Suplementos para alimentação por sonda
ru: Добавки для зондового питания
sv: Kosttillskott för sondmatning
tr: Tüple Besleme Takviyeleri

en: Vitamins & Supplements
xx: Vitamins & Supplements
cs: Vitamíny a výživové doplňky
da: Vitaminer og tilskud
de: Vitamine & Nahrungsergänzungsmittel
es: Vitaminas y complementos
fr: Vitamines et compléments alimentaires
it: Vitamine e integratori
ja: ビタミン・サプリメント
nl: Vitaminen en supplementen
no: Vitaminer og kosttilskudd
pl: Witaminy i suplementy diety
pt: Vitaminas e suplementos
ru: Витамины и пищевые добавки
sv: Vitaminer och kosttillskott
tr: Vitaminler ve Besin Takviyeleri

en: Vitamins
da: Vitaminer
de: Vitamine
es: Vitaminas
fr: Vitamines

en: Hearing Aids
xx: Hearing Aids
cs: Naslouchátka
da: Høreapparater
de: Hörhilfen
es: Audífonos
fr: Aides auditives
it: Apparecchi acustici
ja: 補聴器
nl: Gehoorapparaten
no: Høreapparater
pl: Aparaty słuchowe
pt: Aparelhos auditivos
ru: Слуховые аппараты
sv: Hörapparater
tr: İşitme Cihazları

en: Incontinence Aids
xx: Incontinence Aids
cs: Inkontinenční pomůcky
da: Hjælpemidler mod ufrivillig vandladning
de: Inkontinenzartikel
es: Productos para la incontinencia
fr: Produits pour l'incontinence
it: Presidi per l'incontinenza
ja: 失禁用品
nl: Incontinentieproducten
no: Inkontinenshjelpemidler
pl: Środki higieniczne dla osób cierpiących na nietrzymanie moczu
pt: Auxiliares à incontinência
ru: Препараты для лечения недержания
sv: Inkontinenshjälpmedel
tr: İnkontinans Yardımcıları